West Virginia, session 2026, SB730.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. APPLICATION FOR AND GRANTING OF ASSISTANCE. §9-3-7. Program requirements. The Bureau for Family Assistance shall implement the following requirements on or before January 1, 2027: (1) Reducing the error rate to at or below six percent; and (2) Prohibiting persons living in the United States illegally from obtaining supplement nutrition benefits.